Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2d. new text end new text begin Grant administration; policies and training. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must comply with all policies and procedures for grants administration and management issued by the Office of Grants Management and apply policies and procedures consistently across all divisions of the department engaged in grants management. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the training required under section 16B.98, subdivision 6a, the commissioner must ensure that any employee engaged in grants management activities, including but not limited to reviewing grant applications; awarding grants; administering, managing, and monitoring grants; or approving or disbursing payments within the department completes comprehensive, in-person training on required procedures for grants management before engaging in grants management activities. Training required under this paragraph must be provided at no cost to the employee and during normal working hours. The commissioner must collaborate with the Office of Grants Management when developing and providing the training required under this paragraph. The commissioner must provide supplemental training when grants management procedures or policies are modified. Supplemental training may be limited to addressing modifications to procedures or policies. new text end new text begin (c) Training required under paragraph (b) must provide opportunities for interactive questions and answers and be conducted by an individual who has knowledge and experience in the topics covered by the training as those topics relate to grants management within the department. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must maintain records of employee training required under paragraph (b) for three years after the date of each training. Training records must include: new text end new text begin (1) the dates of each training session; new text end new text begin (2) a summary of each training session; new text end new text begin (3) the names and credentials or qualifications of the individual conducting each training; and new text end new text begin (4) the names and job titles of all employees attending each training. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must provide training to grantees on required procedures and compliance with grants management policies. Training for grantees must include information on grant agreements, required forms, administrative costs, payments, required reports and evaluations, and any other topic related to compliance the commissioner deems relevant. Grantees must complete training as a condition of receiving grant money. Training for grantees may be completed online or in person. new text end